Washington statutes.
RCW 18.19.080

Official records.

The secretary shall keep an official record of all proceedings, a part of which record shall consist of a register of all applicants for registration under this chapter, with the result of each application.

[ 2001 c 251 s 23; 1991 c 3 s 23; 1987 c 512 s 8.]

NOTES:

Severability—2001 c 251: See RCW 18.225.900.